Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1521.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Diné College; remedial education; exemption A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to Diné College for remedial education. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.